apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="parlamentar/an__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nog</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nom</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nog</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nom</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nih</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>noj</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>noj</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nom</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nih</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>no</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nog</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nom</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>no</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nom</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nih</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niji</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijeg</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijem</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijeg</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijem</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niji</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijih</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nije</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijim</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nija</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nije</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijoj</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niju</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijoj</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijom</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nije</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nijih</l>
          <r>an<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>

    <e lm="parlamentaran"><par n="P__adj"/><i>parlamentar</i><par n="parlamentar/an__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="otrovan"><par n="P__adj"/><i>otrov</i><par n="parlamentar/an__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aktivan"><par n="P__adj"/><i>aktiv</i><par n="parlamentar/an__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="negativan"><par n="P__adj"/><i>negativ</i><par n="parlamentar/an__adj"/></e>
